Georgia, session 2025_26, SB234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) As used in this Act, the term:
(1) "Ad valorem taxes" means all ad valorem taxes levied by, for, or on behalf of the
City of Dalton independent school district in this state, except for any ad valorem taxes
levied to pay interest on and to retire bonded indebtedness.
(2) "Adjusted base year assessed value" means the sum of:
(A) The previous adjusted base year assessed value;
S. B. 234
- 1 -

LC 44 3080
(B) An amount equal to the difference between the current year assessed value of the
homestead and the base year assessed value of the homestead, provided that such
amount shall not exceed the total of the previous adjusted base year assessed value of
the homestead multiplied by the inflation rate for the prior year; and
(C) The value of any substantial property change, provided that no such value added
improvements to the homestead shall be duplicated as to the same addition or
improvement.
(3) "Base year assessed value" means:
(A) With respect to an exemption under this section which is first granted to a person
on such person's homestead for the 2026 taxable year, the assessed value for taxable
year 2024, including any final determination of value on appeal pursuant to Code
Section 48-5-311, of the homestead; or
(B) In all other cases, the assessed value, including any final determination of value on
appeal pursuant to Code Section 48-5-311, of the homestead from the taxable year
immediately preceding the taxable year in which the exemption under this section is
first granted to the applicant.
(4) "Homestead" means homestead as defined and qualified in Code Section 48-5-40 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended, with the additional qualification that it shall include not more
than five contiguous acres of homestead property.
(5) "Inflation rate" means the annual inflationary index rate as determined for a given
year by the governing authority of the City of Dalton in accordance with subsection (f)
of this section.
(6) "Previous adjusted base year assessed value" means:
(A) With respect to the year for which the exemption under this section is first granted
to a person on such person's homestead, the base year assessed value; or
S. B. 234
- 2 -

LC 44 3080
(B) In all other cases, the adjusted base year assessed value of the homestead as
calculated in the taxable year immediately preceding the current year, including any
final determination of value on appeal pursuant to Code Section 48-5-311.
(7) "Substantial property change" means any increase or decrease in the assessed value
of a homestead derived from additions or improvements to, or the removal of real
property from, the homestead which occurred after the year in which the base year
assessed value is determined for the homestead. The assessed value of the substantial
property changes shall be established following any final determination of value on
appeal pursuant to Code Section 48-5-311.
(b)(1) Subject to the limitations provided in this section, each resident of the City of
Dalton independent school district is granted an exemption on that person's homestead
from ad valorem taxes in an amount equal to the amount by which the current year
assessed value of that homestead, including any final determination of value on appeal
pursuant to Code Section 48-5-311, exceeds its previous adjusted base year assessed
value.
(2) Except as provided for in subsection (c) of this section, no exemption provided for
in this subsection shall transfer to any subsequent owner of the property, and the assessed
value of the property shall be as provided by law.
(c) No person shall receive the exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section unless
such person or person's agent files an application with the governing authority of the City of
Dalton as will enable the governing authority to make a determination regarding the initial
and continuing eligibility of such person for such exemption; provided, however, that any
person who had previously applied for a homestead exemption, was allowed such homestead
exemption for the 2025 tax year, and remains eligible for a homestead exemption for that
same homestead property in the 2026 tax year shall be automatically allowed the exemption
granted under subsection (b) of this section for that homestead without further application.
The governing authority shall provide application forms for this purpose.
S. B. 234
- 3 -

LC 44 3080
(d) The exemption shall be claimed and returned as provided in Code Section 48-5-50.1 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended. The exemption shall be automatically renewed from year to year
so long as the person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b) of this section
occupies the residence as a homestead. After such person has filed the proper application as
provided in subsection (c) of this section, it shall not be necessary to make application
thereafter for any year, and such exemption shall continue to be allowed to such person. It
shall be the duty of any such person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b)
of this section to notify the governing authority of the City of Dalton in the event that such
person for any reason becomes ineligible for such exemption.
(e)(1) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to or affect
any state ad valorem taxes, county ad valorem taxes for county purposes, county school
district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes, or municipal ad valorem taxes for
municipal purposes.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the homestead
exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall be in addition to and not in lieu
of any other homestead exemption applicable to ad valorem taxes.
(3) The homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not be
applied in addition to any other base year value homestead exemption provided by law
with respect to the City of Dalton independent school district. In any such event, the
governing authority of the City of Dalton shall apply only the base year value homestead
exemption that is larger or more beneficial for the taxpayer with respect to the City of
Dalton independent school district.
(f) For the purposes of this section, the governing authority of the City of Dalton shall
promulgate a standardized method for determining annual inflationary index rates which
reflect the effects of inflation and deflation on the cost of living for residents of the City of
Dalton independent school district for a given calendar year. Such method may utilize the
Consumer Price Index as reported by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States
S. B. 234
- 4 -

LC 44 3080
Department of Labor or any other similar index established by the federal government if the
governing authority of the City of Dalton determines that such federal index fairly reflects
the effects of inflation and deflation on residents of the City of Dalton independent school
district.
100 (g) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall apply to all taxable years
101 beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
102 SECTION 2.
103 In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
104 of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
105 vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
106 SECTION 3.
107 The election superintendent of Whitfield County shall call and conduct an election as
108 provided in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of the City of
109 Dalton independent school district for approval or rejection. The election superintendent
110 shall conduct that election on the Tuesday following the first Monday in November of 2025
111 and shall issue the call and conduct that election as provided by general law. The election
112 superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published once a week
113 for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof in the official organ of Whitfield
114 County. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:
115 "( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides a homestead exemption from City
116 of Dalton independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational
117 ( ) NO purposes in an amount equal to the amount by which the current year
118 assessed value of a homestead exceeds the adjusted base year assessed
119 value, including any final determination of value on appeal pursuant to
120 Code Section 48-5-311 of the O.C.G.A., as amended, of such homestead?"
S. B. 234
- 5 -

LC 44 3080
121 All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
122 to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
123 such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
124 effect on January 1, 2026. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
125 as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
126 be automatically repealed on the 365th calendar day following the election date provided for
127 in this section. The expense of such election shall be borne by the City of Dalton
128 independent school district. It shall be the election superintendent's duty to certify the result
129 thereof to the Secretary of State. The provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the
130 election superintendent and are not intended as directory. If the election superintendent fails
131 or refuses to comply with this section, any elector of the City of Dalton independent school
132 district may apply for a writ of mandamus to compel the election superintendent to perform
133 his or her duties under this section. If the court finds that the election superintendent has not
134 complied with this section, the court shall fashion appropriate relief requiring the election
135 superintendent to call and conduct such election on the date required by this section or on the
136 next date authorized for special elections provided for in Code Section 21-2-540 of the
137 O.C.G.A.
138 SECTION 4.
139 Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
140 its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
141 SECTION 5.
142 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 234
- 6 -